Georgia, session 2025_26, HB851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to create the Athens-Clarke County Board of Elections and Registration, approved
April 5, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993, p. 4631), as amended, is amended by adding a new section to
read as follows:
"SECTION 11.1.
The board established pursuant to this Act shall be abolished on June 30, 2025, and unless
otherwise provided by local law, the election superintendent and board of registrars for
Athens-Clarke County shall be determined as provided by general law."
H. B. 851
- 1 -

LC 47 3434
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 851
- 2 -